District of Columbia statutes.
29-610.03

Liability for improper distributions by limited liability partnership.

(a)

If a partner of a limited liability partnership consents to a distribution made in violation of § 29-610.02 and in consenting to the distribution fails to comply with § 29-604.07, the partner is personally liable to the partnership for the amount of the distribution which exceeds the amount that could have been distributed pursuant to § 29-610.02.

(b)

A person that receives a distribution knowing that the distribution violated of § 29-604.07 is personally liable to the limited liability partnership but only to the extent that the distribution received by the person exceeded the amount that could have been properly paid in accordance with § 29-604.07.

(c)

A person against which an action is commenced because the person is liable under subsection (a) of this section may:

(1)

Implead any other person that is liable under subsection (a) of this section and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person; and

(2)

Implead any person that received a distribution in violation of subsection (b) of this section and seek to enforce a right of contribution from the person in the amount the person received in violation of subsection (b) of this section.

(d)

An action under this section is barred if not commenced not later than 2 years after the distribution.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(10), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-605.03.
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.